Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,183
Other remedies limited.

(MBCA 13.40) (a) The legality
of a proposed or completed corporate action described in subsection (a) of
section 21-2,172 may not be contested, nor may the corporate action be enjoined,
set aside, or rescinded, in a legal or equitable proceeding by a shareholder
after the shareholders have approved the corporate action.

(b) Subsection (a) of this
section does not apply to a corporate action that:

(1) Was not authorized and approved
in accordance with the applicable provisions of:

(i) Sections 21-2,125 to 21-2,170;

(ii) The articles of incorporation
or bylaws; or

(iii)
The resolution of the board of directors authorizing the corporate action;

(2) Was procured as a result
of fraud, a material misrepresentation, or an omission of a material fact
necessary to make statements made, in light of the circumstances in which
they were made, not misleading;

(3) Is an interested transaction, unless it has been
recommended by the board of directors in the same manner as is provided in
section 21-2,122 and has been approved by the shareholders in the same manner
as is provided in section 21-2,123 as if the interested transaction were a
director's conflicting interest transaction; or

(4) Is approved by less than unanimous
consent of the voting shareholders pursuant to section 21-256 if:

(i) The challenge to the
corporate action is brought by a shareholder who did not consent and as to
whom notice of the approval of the corporate action was not effective at least
ten days before the corporate action was effected; and

(ii) The proceeding challenging
the corporate action is commenced within ten days after notice of the approval
of the corporate action is effective as to the shareholder bringing the proceeding.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 183.